Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-414
Recognition of declaration executed in another state.

A declaration executed in another state in compliance with the law of that state or of this state shall be valid for purposes of the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 14.